Hawaii statutes.
§708-830.5 Theft in the first degree. (1)
A person commits the offense of theft in the first degree if the person commits
theft:

(a) Of property or services, the value of which
exceeds $20,000;

(b) Of a firearm;

(c) Of dynamite or other explosive; or

(d) Of property or services during an emergency
period proclaimed by the governor or mayor pursuant to chapter 127A, within the
area covered by the emergency or disaster under chapter 127A, the value of
which exceeds $300.

(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B
felony. [L 1986, c 314, §63; am L 1992, c 289, §1; am L 1993, c 14, §1; am L
2006, c 116, §6; am L 2014, c 111, §20]

Case Notes

Where defendant returned new vehicle after 72 hour possession
and prosecution was unable to prove any economic loss to car dealership, no
intent to deprive dealership of significant portion of vehicle's economic
value, use, or benefit. 86 H. 207, 948 P.2d 1048 (1997).

Where appeals court correctly held that defendant's theft
offense under §708-830(1) and subsection (1)(a) required proof of a value
element which defendant's federal conspiracy offense did not, and was designed
to prevent a substantially different harm--the deprivation of property rights
versus the threat posed by agreements to commit criminal conduct, defendant's
prosecution in state court was not barred under §701-112 and the circuit court
did not err in denying defendant's motion to dismiss in this respect. 126 H.
205, 269 P.3d 740 (2011).

Based on petitioner's performance of petitioner's part of the
contract between homeowner and petitioner and the failure of the respondent
State to produce evidence of the value of the work completed by petitioner, the
State failed to establish that petitioner deprived homeowner of property
exceeding $20,000 in value, the threshold for first degree theft. 129 H. 414,
301 P.3d 1255 (2013).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next